apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="/until__pr">
<e>                           <p><l>'til</l>                <r>until<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>until</l>               <r>until<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="abac/us__n">
<e>                           <p><l>i</l>                   <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>uses</l>                <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bun/co__n">
<e>                           <p><l>cos</l>                 <r>co<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>co</l>                  <r>co<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ko</l>                  <r>co<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>eeing</l>               <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aw</l>                  <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>een</l>                 <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ee</l>                  <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ees</l>                 <r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hom/o__n">
<e>                           <p><l>ines</l>                <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>o</l>                   <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lir/a__n">
<e>                           <p><l>e</l>                   <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>a</l>                   <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="club__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>bing</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>bed</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>bed</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rewr/ite__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>iting</l>               <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ited</l>                <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ote</l>                 <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ited</l>                <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>itten</l>               <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ite</l>                 <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ites</l>                <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pen/is__n">
<e>                           <p><l>es</l>                  <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ises</l>                <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>is</l>                  <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="c/ome__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>oming</l>               <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ame</l>                 <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ome</l>                 <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ome</l>                 <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ome</l>                 <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>omes</l>                <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/kerb__n">
<e>                           <p><l>curbs</l>               <r>kerb<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>curb</l>                <r>kerb<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fe/el__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>eling</l>               <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>lt</l>                  <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>lt</l>                  <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>el</l>                  <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>els</l>                 <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fle/e__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>eing</l>                <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>e</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>es</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/ight__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ighting</l>             <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ought</l>               <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ought</l>               <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ight</l>                <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ights</l>               <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sp/in__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>inning</l>              <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>un</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>un</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>in</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ins</l>                 <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="lira">                 <i>lir</i><par n="lir/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="oversee">              <i>overs</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fight">                <i>f</i><par n="f/ight__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="feel">                 <i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flee">                 <i>fle</i><par n="fle/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="foresee">              <i>fores</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="see">                  <i>s</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blight">               <i>bl</i><par n="f/ight__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spin">                 <i>sp</i><par n="sp/in__vblex"/></e>
